Hawaii, session 2026, SB270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 92-2.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e) [Two or more members] Members of a board[, but less than the number of members that would constitute a quorum for the board,] may attend an informational meeting or presentation on matters relating to board business, including a meeting of another entity, legislative hearing, convention, seminar, or community meeting; provided that the meeting or presentation is not specifically and exclusively organized for or directed toward members of the board.  The board members in attendance may participate in discussions, including discussions among themselves; provided that the discussions occur during and as part of the informational meeting or presentation; provided further that no commitment relating to a vote on the matter is made or sought. [At the next duly noticed meeting of the board, the board members shall report their attendance and the matters presented and discussed that related to board business at the informational meeting or presentation.]" SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request